Florida, session 2026, HB795.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of section
193.155, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
193.155 Homestead assessments.—Homestead property shall be
assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving
the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed
at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property
receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8)
apply.
(3)(a) Except as provided in this subsection or subsection
(8), property assessed under this section shall be assessed at
just value as of January 1 of the year following a change of
ownership. Thereafter, the annual changes in the assessed value
of the property are subject to the limitations in subsections
(1) and (2). For the purpose of this section, a change of
ownership means any sale, foreclosure, or transfer of legal
title or beneficial title in equity to any person, except if any
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb795-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 795 2026
of the following apply:
1. Subsequent to the change or transfer, the same person
is entitled to the homestead exemption as was previously
entitled and:
a. The transfer of title is to correct an error;
b. The transfer is between legal and equitable title or
equitable and equitable title and no additional person applies
for a homestead exemption on the property;
c. The change or transfer is by means of an instrument in
which the owner is listed as both grantor and grantee of the
real property and one or more other individuals are additionally
named as grantee. However, if any individual who is additionally
named as a grantee applies for a homestead exemption on the
property, the application is considered a change of ownership;
d. The change or transfer is by means of an instrument in
which the owner entitled to the homestead exemption is listed as
both grantor and grantee of the real property and one or more
other individuals, all of whom held title as joint tenants with
rights of survivorship with the owner, are named only as
grantors and are removed from the title; or
e. The person is a lessee entitled to the homestead
exemption under s. 196.041(1);
2. Legal or equitable title is changed or transferred
between husband and wife, including a change or transfer to a
surviving spouse or a transfer due to a dissolution of marriage;
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb795-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 795 2026
3. The transfer occurs by operation of law to the
surviving spouse or minor child or children under s. 732.401;
4. Upon the death of the owner, the transfer is between
the owner and another who is a permanent resident and who is
legally or naturally dependent upon the owner; or
5. The transfer occurs with respect to a property where
all of the following apply:
a. Multiple owners hold title as joint tenants with rights
of survivorship;
b. One or more owners were entitled to and received the
homestead exemption on the property;
c. The death of one or more owners occurs; and
d. Subsequent to the transfer, the surviving owner or
owners previously entitled to and receiving the homestead
exemption continue to be entitled to and receive the homestead
exemption; or
6. Upon the death of the owner, the transfer is between
the owner and another who makes the property his or her
homestead within 1 year.
Section 2. This act shall take effect on the effective
date of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by HJR
793 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same
specified intent and purpose, if such amendment to the State
Constitution is approved at the next general election or at an
earlier special election specifically authorized by law for that
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb795-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 795 2026
purpose.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb795-00